Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.76.040

Maps and census correspondence lists—Apportionment—Duties of secretary of state.

(1) With regard to functions relating to census, apportionment, and the establishment of legislative and congressional districts, the secretary of state shall:

(a) Coordinate and monitor precinct mapping functions of the county auditors and county engineers;

(b) Maintain official state base maps and correspondence lists and maintain an index of all such maps and lists;

(c) Furnish to the United States bureau of the census as needed for the decennial census of population, current, accurate, and easily readable versions of maps of all counties, cities, towns, and other areas of this state, which indicate current precinct boundaries together with copies of the census correspondence lists.

(2) The secretary of state shall serve as the state liaison with the United States bureau of census on matters relating to the preparation of maps and the tabulation of population for apportionment purposes.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1904; 1989 c 278 s 2; 1977 ex.s. c 128 s 4; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 129 s 2. Formerly RCW 29.04.140.]

NOTES:

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 128: See note following RCW 29A.16.040.

Effective date—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 129: "This 1976 amendatory act shall take effect on February 1, 1977." [1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 129 s 5.]

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 129: "If any provision of this 1976 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 129 s 6.]